California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [10600. - 10619.]

10600.

It is hereby declared that provision for public social services in this code is a matter of statewide concern. The department is hereby designated as the single state agency with full power to supervise every phase of the administration of public social services, except health care services and medical assistance, for which grants-in-aid are received from the United States government or made by the state in order to secure full compliance with the applicable provisions of state and federal laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10600.1.

(a) The State Department of Social Services succeeds to and is vested with the duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction exercised by the State Department of Health or the State Department of Benefit Payments pursuant to the provisions of this division, except those contained in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 14500), and Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 14520) of Part 3, on the date immediately prior to the date this section becomes operative.

(b) The State Department of Social Services also succeeds to and is vested with the duties,
 purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction heretofore exercised by the State Department of Health with respect to its disability determination function performed pursuant to Titles II and XVI of the federal Social Security Act; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not vest in the State Department of Social Services any power or authority over programs for aid or rehabilitation of mentally disordered or developmentally disabled persons administered by the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 20.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10600.2.

The State Department of Social Services shall have possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property real or personal held for the benefit or use of the Director of Health or the Director of Benefit Payments in the performance of his duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction that are vested in the State Department of Social Services by Section 10600.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10600.3.

All officers and employees of the Director of Health or the Director of Benefit Payments who, on the operative date of the statute amending this section at the 1977 portion of the 1977–78 Regular Session of the Legislature, are serving in the state civil service, other than as temporary employees, and engaged in the performance of a function vested in the State Department of Social Services by Section 10600.1 shall be transferred to the State Department of Social Services. The status, positions, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by them as officers and employees of the State Department of Social Services pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions exempt from civil service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.

The department may expend, in accordance with law, all moneys made available for its use or for the administration of any statute administered by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.2.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall establish, by April 1, 2003, the California Child and Family Service Review System, in order to review all county child welfare systems. These reviews shall cover child protective services, foster care, adoption, family preservation, family support, and independent living.

(b) Child and family service reviews shall maximize compliance with the federal regulations for the receipt of money from Subtitle E (commencing with Section 470) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) and ensure compliance with state plan requirements set forth in Subtitle B (commencing with Section 421) of Title IV of the federal
 Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 621 et seq.).

(c) (1) The California Health and Human Services Agency shall convene a workgroup comprised of representatives of the Judicial Council, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Education, the Department of Justice, any other state departments or agencies that the California Health and Human Services Agency deems necessary, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the California State Association of Counties, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the California Youth Connection, and representatives of California tribes, interested child advocacy organizations, researchers, and foster
 parent organizations. The workgroup shall establish a work plan by which child and family service reviews shall be conducted pursuant to this section, including a process for qualitative peer reviews of case information.

(2) At a minimum, in establishing the work plan, the workgroup shall consider any existing federal program improvement plans entered into by the state pursuant to federal regulations, the outcome indicators to be measured, compliance thresholds for each indicator, timelines for implementation, county review cycles, uniform processes, procedures and review instruments to be used, a corrective action process, and any funding or staffing increases needed to implement the requirements of this section. The agency shall broadly consider collaboration with all entities to allow the adequate exchange of information and
 coordination of efforts to improve outcomes for foster youth and families.

(d) (1) The California Child and Family Service Review System outcome indicators shall be consistent with the federal child and family service review measures and standards for child and family outcomes and system factors authorized by Subtitle B (commencing with Section 421) and Subtitle E (commencing with Section 470) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act and the regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions (Parts 1355 to 1357, inclusive, of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations).

(2) During the first review cycle pursuant to this section, each county shall be reviewed according to the outcome indicators established for the California Child and Family Service Review System.

(3) For subsequent reviews, the workgroup shall consider whether to establish additional outcome indicators that support the federal outcomes and any program improvement plan, and promote good health, mental health, behavioral, educational, and other relevant outcomes for children and families in California’s child welfare services system.

(4) The workgroup shall convene as necessary to update the outcome indicators described in paragraph (1).

(e) The State Department of Social Services shall identify and promote the replication of best practices in child welfare
 services delivery to achieve the measurable outcomes established pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) The State Department of Social Services shall provide information to the Assembly and Senate Budget Committees and appropriate legislative policy committees annually, beginning with the 2002–03 fiscal year, on all of the following:

(1) The department’s progress in planning for the federal child and family service review to be conducted by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and, upon completion of the federal review, the findings of that review, the state’s response to the findings, and the details of any program improvement plan entered into by the state.

(2) The
 department’s progress in implementing the California child and family service reviews, including, but not limited to, the timelines for implementation, the process to be used, and any funding or staffing increases needed at the state or local level to implement the requirements of this section.

(3) The findings and recommendations for child welfare system improvements identified in county self-assessments and county system improvement plans, including information on common statutory, regulatory, or fiscal barriers identified as inhibiting system improvements, any recommendations to overcome those barriers, and, as applicable, information regarding the allocation and use of the moneys provided to counties pursuant to subdivision (i).

(g) Effective April 1, 2003, the existing county
 compliance review system shall be suspended to provide to the State Department of Social Services sufficient lead time to provide training and technical assistance to counties for the preparation necessary to transition to the new child and family service review system.

(h) Beginning January 1, 2004, the department shall commence individual child and family service reviews of California counties. County child welfare systems that do not meet the established compliance thresholds for the outcome measures that are reviewed shall receive technical assistance from teams made up of state and peer-county administrators to assist with implementing best practices to improve their performance and make progress toward meeting established levels of compliance.

(i) (1) To the extent that funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act to enable counties to implement approaches to improving their performance on the outcome indicators under this section, the department, in consultation with counties, shall establish a process for allocating the funds to counties.

(2) The allocation process shall take into account, at a minimum, the extent to which the proposed funding would be used for activities that are reasonably expected to help the county make progress toward the outcome indicators established pursuant to this section, and the extent to which county funding for the child abuse prevention and treatment program is aligned with the outcome indicators.

(3) To the extent possible, a county shall use funds in a manner that
 enables the county to access additional federal, state, and local funds from other available sources. However, a county’s ability to receive additional matching funds from these sources shall not be a determining factor in the allocation process established pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) The department shall provide information to the appropriate committees of the Legislature on the process established pursuant to this subdivision for allocating funds to counties.

(j) (1) Counties shall continue to be responsible for and accountable to the department for child welfare program performance measures, including all of the following:

(A) The outcome and systemic factor measures contained in the federal
 Department of Health and Human Services Child and Family Services Review Procedures Manual, Appendix B, Index of Outcomes and Systemic Factors, and Associated Items and Data Indicators, issued pursuant to Sections 1355.34(b) and 1355.34(c) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Information and other requirements necessary for the California Child and Family Service Review System, as required pursuant to this section.

(C) Monthly caseworker visits with a child in care.

(D) Timeliness to begin an investigation of allegations of child abuse or neglect.

(E) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), other performance measures resulting from new federal mandates or court decrees as specified in an all-county letter issued by the department.

(2) The department shall monitor, on an ongoing basis, county performance on the measures specified in paragraph (1).

(3) At least once every five years, the department shall conduct a comprehensive review of county performance on the measures specified in paragraph (1).

(4) (A) The department shall periodically update the process guides utilized by counties to prepare the self-assessments and system improvement plans to promote implementation and evaluation of
 promising practices and use of data.

(B) The process guides also shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(i) County evaluation of demographics for the children and families served and effectiveness of the system improvement activities for these populations.

(ii) A description of the process by which the department and counties shall develop mutually agreed upon performance targets for improvement.

(5) The department, in consultation with counties, shall develop a process for resolving any disputes regarding the establishment of appropriate targets pursuant to the process provided in paragraph (4).

(6) A county shall submit an update to the department, no less than annually, on its progress in achieving improvements from the county’s baseline for the applicable measure. The department may require a county that has not met its performance targets to submit and implement a corrective action plan, as determined by the director.

(k) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities required under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(l) Subject to an
 appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute for these purposes, the California Child and Family Service Review System shall include data from the Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths (CANS) assessment tool, and may include other behavioral health data that is readily available to the department and determined by the department to be relevant. The department may consider feedback from relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, researchers, county representatives, advocates, and individuals with lived experience, in determining which additional relevant data to include.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 944, Sec. 1.   (AB 1907)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.

The department shall investigate, examine and make reports upon:

(a) The charitable institutions of the state and of the counties and cities of the state, other than county hospitals and institutions under the jurisdiction of another state department.

(b) The public officers who are in any way responsible for the administration of public funds used for public social services which are administered by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.1.

No later than May 14, 2025, and no later than May 14 every year thereafter, the State Department of Social Services shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Senate and Assembly Budget committees with a proposed list of quality improvement activities, including funding totals by activity, that will be funded in the next fiscal year with federal Child Care and Development Funds pursuant to Section 98.53 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 23.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.4.

The Employment Development Department shall investigate, examine, and make reports upon the public officers who are in any way responsible for the administration of public funds used for services which are administered by the Employment Development Department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10602.5 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.

The department shall advise public officers regarding the administration of public social services by public agencies throughout the state, and shall supervise the administration of state public social services, except health care services and medical assistance, to all persons receiving or eligible to receive such state public social services. It shall also supervise the expenditure of any funds for Indian relief which may be granted to the state by the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.

In administering any funds appropriated or made available for disbursement through the counties for welfare purposes, the department shall:

(a) Require as a condition for receiving such grants-in-aid, that the county shall bear that proportion of the total expense of furnishing aid, as is fixed by the law relating to such aid.

(b) Establish regulations not in conflict with the law fixing statewide standards for the administration of all state or federally assisted public social services, except health care services and medical assistance, which define and control the conditions under which such public social services may be granted or refused. All regulations established by the department shall be binding upon the boards of supervisors and the county department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.5.

(a) (1) Commencing July 1, 1992, the department shall pay only those county welfare department claims for federal or state reimbursement of administration and services under this division which are filed with the department within nine months of the end of the calendar quarter in which the costs are paid. A claim filed after that time may only be paid if the claim falls within the exceptions set forth in federal law. Any claim filed with the department after July 1, 1985, shall be subject to these limitations.

(2) The department may change the nine-month limitation specified in paragraph (1), as deemed necessary by the department to comply with federal changes which affect claiming time limits.

(b) (1) The department may waive the time limit imposed by subdivision (a) if the department determines there was good cause for a county’s failure to file a claim or claims within the time limit.

(2) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, “good cause” means circumstances which are beyond the county’s control, including acts of God and documented action or inaction by the state or federal government.

(B) “Circumstances beyond the county’s control” do not include neglect or failure on the part of the county or any of its offices, officers, or employees.

(C) A county shall request a waiver of the time limit imposed by this section for good cause in accordance with regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

(3) The department’s authority to waive the time limit under this subdivision shall be subject to the availability of funds and shall not apply to claims submitted beyond 18 months after the end of the calendar quarter in which costs were paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 122.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.6.

(a) The department shall pay only those assistance claims for federal or state reimbursement under this division that are filed with the department within 18 months after the end of the calendar quarter in which the costs are paid.

(b) Any claim that is filed after the time specified in subdivision (a) may be paid only if an exception under federal law applies to that claim.

(c) The department may change the 18-month time limit specified in subdivision (a), as deemed necessary by the department to comply with federal changes that affect time limits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 12.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10605.

(a) If the director believes that a county is substantially failing to comply with any provision of this code or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or any regulation pertaining to any program administered by the department, and the director determines that formal action may be necessary to secure compliance, the director shall inform the county welfare director and the board of supervisors of that failure. The notice to the county welfare director and board of supervisors
 shall be in writing and shall allow the county a specified period of time, not less than 30 days, to correct its failure to comply with the law or regulations. If within the specified period the county does not comply or provide reasonable assurances in writing that it will comply within the additional time as the director may allow, the director may take one or both of the following actions:

(1) (A) Bring an action for injunctive relief to secure immediate compliance.

(B) A county that is found to be failing to substantially comply with the law or regulations pertaining to any program administered by the department may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may make orders or judgments as may be necessary to secure county compliance.

(2) Order the county to appear at a hearing before the director to show cause why the director should not take administrative action to secure compliance. The county shall be given at least 30 days’ notice of the hearing. The director shall consider the case on the record established at the hearing and, within 30 days, shall render proposed findings and a proposed decision on the issues. The proposed findings and decisions shall be submitted to the county, and the county shall have the opportunity to appear within 10 days, at a time and place as may be determined by the director, for the purpose of presenting oral
 arguments respecting the proposed findings and decisions. Thereupon, the director shall make final findings and issue a final administrative decision.

(b) If the director determines, based on the record established at the hearing pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), that the county is failing to comply with laws or regulations pertaining to any program administered by the department, or if the Department of Human Resources certifies to the director that a county is not in conformity with established merit system standards under Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 19800) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and that administrative sanctions are necessary to secure compliance, the director may invoke either of the following sanctions, except that the sanctions shall not be invoked concurrently:

(1) Except for child welfare services programs, withhold all or part
 of state and federal funds from the county until the county demonstrates to the director that it has complied.

(2) (A) Assume, temporarily, direct responsibility for the administration of all or part of any or all programs administered by the department in the county until the time as the county provides reasonable written assurances to the director of its intention and ability to comply. During the period of direct state administrative responsibility, the director or their authorized representative shall have all of the powers and responsibilities of the county director, except that
 the authorized representative shall not be subject to the authority of the board of supervisors.

(B) (i) In the event that the director invokes sanctions pursuant to this section, the county shall be responsible for providing any funds as may be necessary for the continued operation of all programs administered by the department in the county. If a county fails or refuses to provide these funds, including a sufficient amount to reimburse any and all costs incurred by the department in directly administering any program in the county, the Controller may deduct an amount certified by the director as necessary for the continued operation of these programs by the department from any state or federal funds payable to the county for any purpose.

(ii) In the event of a state-imposed sanction, the amount of the sanction
 shall be no greater than the amount of county funds that the county would be required to contribute to fully match the state General Fund allocation for the particular program or programs for which the county is being sanctioned for those programs that are not Public Safety Programs realigned pursuant to 2011 realignment legislation.

(iii) In the event of a state-imposed sanction pursuant to this paragraph for the Public Safety Programs realigned pursuant to 2011 realignment legislation that are administered by the Department of Social Services, the amount of the sanction shall be no greater than the amount of funding originally provided to the county in the 2011–12 fiscal year for the particular program from the Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, as adjusted by the county’s share of the additional incremental funding provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section
 30027.5 of, paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 30027.6 of, paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 30027.7 of, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 30027.8 of, the Government Code, the estimated growth funding for the program from the Support Services Growth Subaccount within the Sales and Use Tax Growth Account, and any adjustment to the county allocation pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 30029.5 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) The department is authorized to conduct or have conducted audits and reviews in order to meet its obligations for child welfare programs and to ensure the protection of children and families.

(2) Except when
 there is a risk of immediate harm to a minor, the department shall provide the county with at least 30-calendar days’ notice of the department’s intent to perform an audit or review. This notice shall include the intended purpose, scope, and timing of the audit or review.

(3) The county shall have an opportunity to respond to the audit or review and may request an extension of up to 30 calendar days, that shall be granted by the director if there is good cause and unless there is a risk of immediate harm to a minor. The request for extension shall be submitted to the department within 10 business days of receipt of the audit or review notice. The department, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, shall develop a definition of good cause for the purposes of this section.

(4) The
 notice required by paragraph (2) does not limit the authority of the department under federal or state law to examine other information or records should that become prudent or necessary during the course of the audit or review.

(5) The county shall be presented with the audit or review findings at the conclusion of the audit or review. The county shall have 10 business days to provide a written response to the audit or review findings. The department shall have 10 business days thereafter to issue a final response to the county’s written response. Both the county response and the department’s written response shall be published as part of the audit or review and made final.

(6) The audit or review shall not result in a fiscal sanction to the county, as defined in subdivision (b).

(7) The department may impose a fiscal disallowance if there is a finding of misappropriation of funding, and the county shall be afforded due process as specified in subdivision (d).

(d) (1) If the audit or review specified in subdivision (c) results in a fiscal disallowance, the county may request a hearing within 30 calendar days of the notice of sanction or finalized audit or review. The hearing request shall be in writing and shall be known as the Statement of Disputed Issues, which shall set forth the issues in dispute, and the county’s contentions as to those issues, including any documentation to support the county’s contentions. The hearing shall take place before a hearing officer
 designated by the director to examine any disputed audit or review finding.

(A) Following the hearing, the hearing officer shall submit the proposed final audit or review of the findings to the director. The director may take any of the following actions:

(i) Adopt the proposed findings with or without reading the record. The findings shall be final upon adoption by the director.

(ii) Reject the proposed findings and have findings prepared based upon the documentation presented at the hearing.

(iii) Refer the matter back to the hearing officer to receive additional information and prepare new findings.

(B) The final audit or review of the findings shall include the county’s Statement of
 Disputed Issues, including its accompanying documentation. The final audit or review of the findings shall be subject to judicial review.

(e) If the director is informed that a county is failing to comply with any provision of law or regulation pertaining to a program administered by the department, and the director determines that formal action, as described in subdivision (a), is not yet warranted but that county action is necessary to correct the reported failure, the director shall inform the county welfare director and the board of supervisors by written notice. The written notice shall, at a minimum, identify the legal compliance issues and provide a minimum of 10 days for county response.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the department from bringing an action for writ of mandamus or any other action in court as may be appropriate to ensure no interruption in the provision of benefits to any person eligible therefore under federal law, the provisions of this code or the regulations of the department.

(g) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving the board of supervisors of the responsibility to provide funds necessary for
 the continued services required by law.

(2) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as preventing a county from seeking judicial review of action taken by the director pursuant to this section under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure or, except in cases arising under Sections 10962 and 10963, from seeking injunctive relief when deemed appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   (AB 426)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10605.1.

(a) If a federal disallowance or other financial penalty is imposed on the state based on the results of the federal Children and Family Services Review pursuant to Section 1320a-2a of Title 42 of the United States Code, the department, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, shall develop an apportionment of the total counties’ share of the penalty pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 30026.5 of the Government Code to the individual counties whose performance contributed to the failure to meet the federal outcome target upon which the federal disallowance or other financial penalty is based.

(b) The apportionment of the total counties’ share of the penalty
 to the appropriate individual counties shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) For individual counties subject to a share of the federal disallowance or other financial penalty pursuant to this section that did not expend in the fiscal year upon which the federal disallowance or financial penalty is based an amount equivalent to 90 percent of that which the county would have had to spend in the 2011–12 fiscal year in the absence of 2011 Realignment Legislation to access the augmentation funding pursuant to Section 10609.9, as that section read prior to the enactment of 2011 Realignment Legislation, on services that were previously funded from the General Fund from with Child Welfare Services Allocation prior to the enactment of 2011 Realignment Legislation, an increased share of the federal disallowance or other financial penalty as calculated in paragraph (2). The determination of whether a county expended the amount necessary
 to be eligible for the allocation pursuant to this subdivision shall be made based on claims for that fiscal year received by the department as of August 1 of the subsequent fiscal year to the fiscal year in which the federal disallowance or financial penalty is based.

(2) For every percentage point below the 90 percent expenditure level pursuant to paragraph (1), the individual county’s share of the federal disallowance or other financial penalty shall be increased by 2 percentage points. Percentages shall be rounded up or down to the nearest full percentage for purposes of this paragraph.

(3) Small counties, defined as those counties with a population of 50,000 or fewer pursuant to demographic information released each year by the Department of Finance, are exempt from the minimum expenditure requirement and the increased share of penalties pursuant to paragraphs (1) and
 (2).

(4) The increased share of federal disallowances or other financial penalties pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not be imposed on any county if the revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.15 and 6201.15 and allocated to the county’s Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account in the fiscal year upon which the federal disallowance or other financial penalty is based do not equal the maximum level of funds allocated to the county’s Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account in any fiscal year prior to the fiscal year upon which the federal disallowance or other financial penalty is based plus additional amounts if necessary to fully fund foster care assistance and Adoption Assistance Program payments in the fiscal year upon which the federal disallowance or other financial penalty is based.

(5) The director is authorized to waive
 the additional county share of federal disallowances or other financial penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 71.5.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

10605.2.

If the director believes that a county probation department is substantially failing to comply with any provision of this code or any regulation pertaining to the placement activities required to be performed by the probation department to ensure that the needs of wards in placements whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program are met, and the director determines that formal action may be necessary to secure compliance, he or she shall inform the chief probation officer, the presiding judge of the juvenile court, and the board of supervisors of that failure. The notice to the chief probation officer, the presiding judge of the juvenile court, and board of supervisors shall be in writing and shall allow the
 county probation department a specified period of time, not less than 30 days, to correct its failure to comply with the law or regulations. If within the specified period the county probation department does not comply or provide reasonable assurances in writing that it will comply within the additional time as the director may allow, the director may take one or both of the following actions:

(a) Bring an action for injunctive relief to secure immediate compliance.

Any county probation department that is found to be failing in a substantial manner to comply with the law or regulations pertaining to placement activities required to be performed by the probation department to ensure that the needs of wards in placement whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program are met, may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may make
 orders or judgments as may be necessary to secure county probation department compliance.

(b) Order the county probation department to appear at a hearing before the director to show cause why the director should not take administrative action to secure compliance. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department.

If the director determines, based on the record established at the hearing, that the county probation department is failing to comply with the provisions of this code or the regulations pertaining to the placement activities required to be performed by the probation department to ensure that the needs of wards in placement funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program are met, or if the State Personnel Board certifies to the director that a county probation department is not in conformity with established merit system
 standards under Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 19800) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and that administrative sanctions are necessary to secure compliance, the director may invoke either of the following sanctions:

(1) Withhold all or part of state and federal funds from the county probation department until the county probation department demonstrates to the director that it has complied.

(2) Assume, temporarily, direct responsibility for fulfilling the placement activities required by law and regulations to ensure that the needs of the wards in placement funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program are met, until the time as the county probation department provides reasonable assurances to the director of its intention and ability to comply. During the period of direct state administrative responsibility, the director or his
 or her authorized representative shall have all of the powers and responsibilities of the chief probation officer with regard to placement requirements for wards whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program, except that he or she shall not be subject to the authority of the board of supervisors.

In the event that the director invokes sanctions pursuant to this section, the county probation department shall be responsible for providing any funds as may be necessary for the continued fulfillment of placement activities as required by law and regulation for the placement of wards whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program administered on behalf of the department in the county probation department. If a county probation department fails or refuses to provide these funds, including a sufficient amount to reimburse any and all costs incurred by the
 department in performing the activities required for the placement of wards whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program in the county probation department, the Controller may deduct an amount certified by the director as necessary for the continued operation of these programs by the department from any state or federal funds payable to the county probation department for any purpose.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing a county probation department from seeking judicial review under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure of any final decision of the director made after a hearing conducted under this section. This review shall be the exclusive remedy available to the county probation department for review of the director’s decision.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the director from bringing an action for writ of